Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 19 Sale of Corporate Stock Under Execution or Attachment

Cross references. —

As to attachment or levy upon securities, see § 34.1-9-203.

Applied

in

In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Attachment and Garnishment §§ 116 to 118.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 37.

§ 1-19-101.
Right to levy and sale.

Rights and shares of
stock in any corporation owned or held by any defendant in execution
or attachment, or in trust for such person, may be levied upon under
any execution or writ of attachment, and may be sold under any execution
in the manner provided.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2772; R.S. 1899, § 3893; C.S. 1910, § 4747; C.S. 1920, § 6020; R.S. 1931, § 89-2976; C.S. 1945, § 3-4401; W.S. 1957, § 1-490; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-101

.

Pleadings. —

Section

1-19-103

provides that a levy upon the interest of the legal or equitable owner of corporate stock shall be made in a particular way. In action by assignee of a certificate of stock to compel the corporation to make the proper transfer on its books, the answer alleged that, on a certain date, one B. obtained judgment against husband of assignor, “who held said certificate of stock in trust for and to the use of her said husband, and on the 19th day of December, 1887, execution was issued on said judgment, and on the 6th day of February, 1888, the sheriff of Laramie county, Wyoming territory, levied said execution upon said shares of stock as the property of said” husband, and defendant had no notice of assignment to plaintiff, held, that answer was demurrable (now subject to motion), in that it did not allege that judgment debtor was equitable owner of the stock at the date of the levy, nor that sheriff of Laramie county was proper officer to execute writ nor how levy was made. Wyoming Fair Ass'n v. Talbott, 3 Wyo. 244, 21 P. 700,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1889).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

§ 1-19-102.
Duty to furnish statement of defendant's rights or shares.

When any execution or
writ of attachment is issued against the owner of any rights or shares
in any corporation or for whom any rights or shares are held by any
person other than the defendant, it is the duty of any officer of
the corporation, or if there is no officer in the state, then the
resident manager or agent, upon the request of the officer having
the execution or writ of attachment, to furnish him a certificate
under his hand stating the number of rights or shares which the defendant
holds, or which are held in trust for defendant, or for his use, in
the corporation.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 2773; R.S. 1899, § 3894; C.S. 1910, § 4748; C.S. 1920, § 6021; R.S. 1931, § 89-2977; C.S. 1945, § 3-4402; W.S. 1957, § 1-491; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-102

.

Cited

in

Wyoming Fair Ass'n v. Talbott, 3 Wyo. 244, 21 P. 700,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1889).

§ 1-19-103.
Manner of making levy.

To levy execution or
attachment on rights or shares in a corporation, the officer making
the levy shall leave a true copy of the writ, with any officer of
the corporation and if there is no officer, then with the resident
manager or agent thereof, together with the officer’s certificate
stating that he levies upon and takes in execution or attachment the
rights or shares to satisfy the writ.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 2774; R.S. 1899, § 3895; C.S. 1910, § 4749; C.S. 1920, § 6022; R.S. 1931, § 89-2978; C.S. 1945, § 3-4403; W.S. 1957, § 1-492; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-103

.

Security interest in corporate stock. —

Security interest in corporate stock is perfected, pursuant to this section, where service of a writ of execution is made on the corporation's registered agent because a corporate officer is not present when service is attempted. However, a security interest in corporate stock is not perfected, pursuant to this section, where service of a writ of execution is made on a law partner of the corporation's registered agent.
Patel v. CWCapital Asset Mgmt., LLC, 2010 WY 147, 242 P.3d 1015,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2010).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-19-104.
Sale of rights or shares.

Rights or shares in any
corporation levied upon by writ of attachment shall be held subject
to the judgment rendered in the action in which the writ is issued.
Whenever execution is levied upon such rights or shares, they shall
be sold as personal property as provided by law, at the front door
of the courthouse in the county in which the levy is made.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 2775; R.S. 1899, § 3896; C.S. 1910, § 4750; C.S. 1920, § 6023; R.S. 1931, § 89-2979; C.S. 1945, § 3-4404; W.S. 1957, § 1-493; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-104

.

Cross references. —

As to sale of personal property, see §

1-17-312

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

§ 1-19-105.
Certificate of sale; transfer on corporate books.

Every officer who sells
any rights or shares of stock in any corporation under an execution
shall execute to the purchaser a certificate in writing reciting the
sale and payment of the consideration, and conveying to the purchaser
the rights and shares. The officer shall also leave with an officer
of the corporation or the resident manager or agent, a true copy of
the certificate. The person having charge of the books of the corporation
shall make entries in the books as necessary to vest the legal and
equitable title to the rights or shares in the purchaser.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 2776; R.S. 1899, § 3897; C.S. 1910, § 4751; C.S. 1920, § 6024; R.S. 1931, § 89-2980; C.S. 1945, § 3-4405; W.S. 1957, § 1-494; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-105

.

§ 1-19-106.
Rights and privileges of purchasers.

A purchaser of rights
or shares in a corporation at a sale made by an officer, upon receiving
a certificate of the sale as provided in W.S.

1-19-105

is deemed to be the legal and equitable owner of the
rights or shares and is entitled to all dividends and to the same
rights and privileges as a shareholder of the corporation as was the
defendant in execution, even though the rights and shares of stock
may not have been transferred upon the books of the company.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 2777; R.S. 1899, § 3898; C.S. 1910, § 4752; C.S. 1920, § 6025; R.S. 1931, § 89-2981; C.S. 1945, § 3-4406; W.S. 1957, § 1-495; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-106

.

§ 1-19-107.
Effect of levy.

Rights and shares of
stock in a corporation levied upon as provided by W.S.

1-19-101

through

1-19-107

shall be held and bound from the time of the levy.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 80, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 2778; R.S. 1899, § 3899; C.S. 1910, § 4753; C.S. 1920, § 6026; R.S. 1931, § 89-2982; C.S. 1945, § 3-4407; W.S. 1957, § 1-496; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-107

.

Cited

in

Patel v. Cwcapital Asset Mgmt., Llc, 2010 WY 147, 242 P.3d 1015,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Nov. 16, 2010).

§ 1-19-108.
Liability of shares pledged or used as collateral.

When shares of any corporation
are pledged in good faith, or pledged as collateral security for any
loan or debt, and the certificate is delivered upon the pledge or
debt, the shares are not liable to be taken on execution against the
pledgor except for the excess of their value over the sum for which
they have been pledged.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 28, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2779; R.S. 1899, § 3900; C.S. 1910, § 4754; C.S. 1920, § 6027; R.S. 1931, § 89-2983; C.S. 1945, § 3-4408; W.S. 1957, § 1-497; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-20-108

.